Massachusetts, session 194th, S2470.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding Section 5, Part 1, Chapter 115 of the General Laws or any
other general or special law to the contrary, and in order to promote the public good, payments
received by veterans as reimbursement for out-of-pocket health care costs shall be added to the
list of Exclusions listed in 760 CMR 6.05 (3) Exclusions from Gross Household Income.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1